Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 2. State Chemist

§ 35-7-201.
Under direction of department of agriculture; appointment; duties generally; salary and expenses; fee for analysis.

The office of state chemist heretofore created by the legislature is hereby transferred with all present and existing appropriations and all property under its control to the state department of agriculture of Wyoming, and shall hereafter be under the direction and supervision of said department. The state chemist shall be appointed by the state board of agriculture with the approval of the Wyoming personnel division and his salary shall be determined and fixed by the Wyoming personnel division to be paid by the state of Wyoming out of any money not otherwise appropriated, the same to be paid by the state auditor in the manner provided for the payment of other accounts against the state, and he shall receive no other salary.

It shall be the duty of the state chemist to make or cause to be made, analysis of such foods, drugs, drinks, gasoline, illuminating oils or other materials relative to the enforcement of this article, as shall be submitted to him or shall be deemed advisable for such analysis, and make a full and complete written report of the same, and when so requested, it shall be his duty to testify in court. He shall receive his necessary traveling expenses as paid to other state employees as allowed by law, to be paid by the state of Wyoming when employed in performing the duties of his office.

Any person, firm, corporation or association, with the exception of cities, counties and state regulatory agencies, who shall submit any article or commodity for analysis or examination shall remit such fee as may be established for the purpose of making this service available to the general public at a reasonable cost, but which fee shall be comparable to that charged for the same service by commercial laboratories operating within the state. Accounting shall be made of all fees so received by the state chemist and shall be paid into the general fund.

The state chemist may allow the testing, inspection and reporting requirements of this article to be conducted electronically as provided by the Uniform Electronic Transaction Act, W.S.

40-21-101

through

40-21-119

and any applicable federal electronic requirements.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 104, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3723; Laws 1925, ch. 105, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 45-101; C.S. 1945, § 46-101; Laws 1949, ch. 65, § 21; 1951, ch. 66, § 1; 1953, ch. 139, § 29; 1957, ch. 157, § 26; W.S. 1957, § 35-230; Laws 1961, ch. 148, § 43; 1965, ch. 115, § 43; 1967, ch. 181, § 28; 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 2005, ch. 175, § 2.

Cross references. —

For duty to analyze whether articles are adulterated or misbranded, see §

35-7-111

.

For constitutional provisions requiring stated salaries to be paid and payment of fees to proper treasury, see art. 14, §§ 1, 2, Wyo. Const.

As to prohibition against other compensation, see §§

9-3-103

to

9-3-104

. As to the creation of the state department of agriculture and the state board of agriculture, see §

11-2-101

.

As to duty to make analysis of illuminating oils and gasoline, see §§

40-7-103

,

40-7-107

.

The 2005 amendment

added (d).

Laws 2005, ch. 175, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

Stated

in

Combined Ins. Co. of Am. v. Sinclair, 584 P.2d 1034,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1978); County Court Judges Ass'n v. Sidi, 752 P.2d 960 (Wyo. 1988).

§ 35-7-202.
Employment of assistant and second assistant chemists; salaries; location of office; duties generally.

The state chemist by and with the approval of the state board of agriculture is hereby authorized to employ an assistant to the state chemist and a second assistant to the state chemist who shall receive salaries to be determined and fixed by the Wyoming personnel division; the salaries to be paid by the state of Wyoming out of any moneys not otherwise appropriated, the same to be paid by the state auditor in the manner provided for the payment of such accounts against the state. The assistant chemists shall keep their offices at the University of Wyoming and the board of trustees of said university shall furnish the necessary room for the carrying out of the provisions of this article. The assistant chemists shall perform such duties as they may be required to perform by the state chemist.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 104, § 2; 1913, ch. 107, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3724; Laws 1925, ch. 105, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 45-102; C.S. 1945, § 46-102; Laws 1949, ch. 65, § 22; 1951, ch. 66, § 2; 1953, ch. 139, § 30; 1957, ch. 157, § 27; W.S. 1957, § 35-231; Laws 1961, ch. 148, § 44; 1965, ch. 115, § 44.

Cross references. —

See cross references to §

35-7-201

. As to the creation of the state board of agriculture, see §

11-2-101

.

§ 35-7-203.
Expenses.

The necessary traveling expenses and expenses for the purchase of apparatus, chemicals, etc., shall be paid from any appropriation made by the legislature as a contingent fund for the state chemist; provided, that the expense shall be limited to the appropriation made.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 104, § 3, C.S. 1920, § 3725; R.S. 1931, § 45-103; C.S. 1945, § 46-103; W.S. 1957, § 35-232.

§ 35-7-204.
Seal; report.

The state chemist shall keep a seal with which to attest official acts and documents. He shall, as required by W.S.

9-2-1014

, report to the governor, on or before the first day of October of each year, including itemized statements of all persons employed by him together with such statistics and other matter as he may regard of value to the administration or public at large.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 104, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 3726; R.S. 1931, § 45-104; C.S. 1945, § 46-104; W.S. 1957, § 35-233; Laws 1973, ch. 215, § 1.